District of Columbia statutes.
1-624.23

Administration of subchapter.

The Department of Employment Services shall have responsibility for the administration of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2423
as added Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 601, 43 DCR 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-625A.3.